Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6286.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8-8.1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-8.1 entitled "Domestic
Assault" is hereby amended to read as follows:
8-8.1-3. Protective orders — Penalty — Jurisdiction.
(a) A person suffering from domestic abuse may file a complaint in the district court
requesting any order that will protect them from the abuse, including, but not limited to, the
following:
(1) Ordering that the defendant be restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting,
molesting, or otherwise interfering with the plaintiff at home, on the street, or elsewhere;
(2) Ordering the defendant to vacate the household forthwith, unless the defendant holds
sole legal interest in the household;
(3) Upon motion by the plaintiff, the plaintiff’s address shall be released only at the
discretion of the district court judge;
(4) Ordering the defendant to surrender physical possession of all firearms in his or her
possession, care, custody, or control and shall further order a person restrained not to purchase or
receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, any firearms while the protective order is in effect. The
defendant shall surrender the firearms within twenty-four (24) hours of notice of the protective
order to the Rhode Island state police or local police department or to a federally licensed firearms
dealer.
(i) A person ordered to surrender possession of any firearm(s) pursuant to this section shall,

within seventy-two (72) hours after being served with the order, either:
(A) File with the court a receipt showing the firearm(s) was physically surrendered to the
Rhode Island state police or local police department, or to a federally licensed firearm dealer; or
(B) Attest to the court that, at the time of the order, the person had no firearms in their
immediate physical possession or control, or subject to their immediate physical possession or
control, and that the person, at the time of the attestation, has no firearms in their immediate
physical possession or control or subject to their immediate physical possession or control.
(ii) If a person restrained under this section transfers a firearm(s) to a federally licensed
firearms dealer pursuant to this section, the person restrained under this section may instruct the
federally licensed firearms dealer to sell the firearm(s) or to transfer ownership in accordance with
state and federal law, to a qualified named individual who is not a member of the person’s dwelling
house, who is not related to the person by blood, marriage, or relationship as defined by § 15-15-
1(7), and who is not prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law. The owner of
any firearm(s) sold shall receive any financial value received from its sale, less the cost associated
with taking possession of, storing, and transferring of the firearm(s).
(iii) Every individual to whom possession of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this
subsection shall be prohibited from transferring or returning any firearm(s) to the person restrained
under this section while the protective order remains in effect and shall be informed of this
prohibition. Any knowing violation of this subsection is a felony that shall be punishable by a fine
of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for a term of not less than one
year and not more than five (5) years, or both.
(iv) An individual to whom possession of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this
subsection shall return a firearm(s) to the person formerly restrained under this section only if the
person formerly restrained under this section provides documentation issued by a court indicating
that the restraining order issued pursuant to this section that prohibited the person from purchasing,
carrying, transporting, or possessing firearms has expired and has not been extended.
(b) After notice to the respondent and after a hearing, which shall be held within fifteen
(15) days of surrendering said firearms, the court, in addition to any other restrictions, may, for any
protective order issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2017, continue the order of surrender, and
shall further order a person restrained under this section not to purchase or receive, or attempt to
purchase or receive, any firearms while the protective order is in effect.
(c) The district court shall provide a notice on all forms requesting a protective order that
a person restrained under this section shall be ordered pursuant to § 11-47-5, to surrender
possession or control of any firearms and not to purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or
LC002809 - Page 2 of 12

receive, any firearms while the restraining order is in effect. The form shall further provide that any
person who has surrendered their firearms shall be afforded a hearing within fifteen (15) days of
surrendering their firearms.
(d) Any firearm surrendered in accordance with this section to the Rhode Island state police
or local police department shall be returned to the person formerly restrained under this section
upon their request when:
(1) The person formerly restrained under this section produces documentation issued by a
court indicating that the restraining order issued pursuant to this section that prohibited the person
from purchasing, carrying, transporting, or possessing firearms has expired and has not been
extended; and
(2) The law enforcement agency in possession of the firearms determines that the person
formerly restrained under this section is not otherwise prohibited from possessing a firearm under
state or federal law.
(3) The person required to surrender his or her firearms pursuant to this section shall not
be responsible for any costs of storage of any firearms surrendered pursuant to this section.
(e) The Rhode Island state police are authorized to develop rules and procedures pertaining
to the storage and return of firearms surrendered to the Rhode Island state police or local police
departments pursuant to this section. The Rhode Island state police may consult with the Rhode
Island Police Chiefs’ Association in developing rules and procedures.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, expand, or in any way modify orders
issued under § 12-29-4 or § 15-5-19.
(g) Nothing in this section shall limit a defendant’s right under existing law to petition the
court at a later date for modification of the order.
(h) The court shall immediately notify the person suffering from domestic abuse whose
complaint gave rise to the protective order and the law enforcement agency where the person
restrained under this section resides of the hearing.
(i) The person suffering from domestic abuse, local law enforcement, and the person
restrained under this section shall all have an opportunity to be present and to testify when the court
considers the petition.
(j) At the hearing, the person restrained under this section shall have the burden of showing,
by clear and convincing evidence, that, if their firearm rights were restored, they would not pose a
danger to the person suffering from domestic abuse or to any other person.
(1) In determining whether to restore a person’s firearm rights, the court shall examine all
relevant evidence, including, but not limited to: the complaint seeking a protective order; the
LC002809 - Page 3 of 12

criminal record of the person restrained under this section; the mental health history of the person
restrained under this section; any evidence that the person restrained under this section has, since
being served with the order, engaged in violent or threatening behavior against the person suffering
from domestic abuse or any other person.
(2) If the court determines, after a review of all relevant evidence and after all parties have
had an opportunity to be heard, that the person restrained under this section would not pose a danger
to the person suffering from domestic abuse or to any other person if the person’s firearm rights
were restored, then the court may grant the petition and modify the protective order and lift the
firearm prohibition.
(3) If the court lifts a person’s firearms prohibition pursuant to this subsection, the court
shall issue the person written notice that the person is no longer prohibited under this section from
purchasing or possessing firearms while the protective order is in effect.
(k) The prohibition against possessing a firearm(s) due solely to the existence of a domestic
violence restraining order issued under this section shall not apply with respect to sworn peace
officers as defined in § 12-7-21 and active members of military service, including members of the
reserve components thereof, who are required by law or departmental policy to carry departmental
firearms while on duty or any person who is required by their employment to carry a firearm in the
performance of his or her duties. Any individual exempted pursuant to this exception may possess
a firearm only during the course of his or her employment. Any firearm required for employment
must be stored at the place of employment when not being possessed for employment use; all other
firearm(s) must be surrendered in accordance with this section.
(l) Any violation of the aforementioned protective order shall subject the defendant to being
found in contempt of court.
(m) No order shall issue under this section that would have the effect of compelling a
defendant who has the sole legal interest in a residence to vacate that residence.
(n) The contempt order shall not be exclusive and shall not preclude any other available
civil or criminal remedies. Any relief granted by the court shall be for a fixed period of time not to
exceed three (3) years, at the expiration of which time the court may extend any order upon motion
of the plaintiff for such additional time as it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff from abuse.
The court may modify its order at any time upon motion of either party.
(o) Any violation of a protective order under this chapter of which the defendant has actual
notice shall be a misdemeanor that shall be punished by a fine of no more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. Beginning July 1, 2025, said
violation shall be prosecuted by an attorney appointed by the prosecuting authority who shall self-
LC002809 - Page 4 of 12

certify that they have successfully completed a specialized domestic violence prosecution training
course and updated training every four (4) years thereafter, aligned with national best practices and
eligible for continuing legal education credit(s) as approved by the Rhode Island Bar Association.
(p) Beginning July 1, 2025, said violation shall, at the initial appearance, be presented by
a member of a law enforcement agency and/or prosecuted by an attorney appointed by the
prosecuting authority all of whom shall self-certify that they have successfully completed a
specialized domestic violence prosecution training course and updated training every four (4) years
thereafter, aligned with national best practices and eligible for continuing legal education credit(s)
as approved by the Rhode Island Bar Association.
(p)(q) The penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties provided
under § 12-29-5.
(q)(r) “Actual notice” means that the defendant has received a copy of the order by service
thereof or by being handed a copy of the order by a police officer pursuant to § 8-8.1-5(d).
(r)(s) The district court shall have criminal jurisdiction over all violations of this chapter.
SECTION 2. Section 12-29-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-29 entitled "Domestic
Violence Prevention Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-29-4. Restrictions upon and duties of court.
(a)(1) Because of the likelihood of repeated violence directed at those who have been
victims of domestic violence in the past, when a person is charged with or arrested for a crime
involving domestic violence, that person may not be released from custody on bail or personal
recognizance before arraignment without first appearing before the court or bail commissioner. The
court or bail commissioner authorizing release shall issue a no-contact order prohibiting the person
charged or arrested from having contact with the victim.
(2) At the time of arraignment or bail hearing the court or bail commissioner shall
determine whether a no-contact order shall be issued or extended.
(3) Willful violation of a court order issued under subdivision (1), (2), or as part of
disposition of this subdivision of this subsection is a misdemeanor. Beginning July 1, 2025, said
violation shall be prosecuted by an attorney appointed by the prosecuting authority who shall self-
certify that they have successfully completed a specialized domestic violence prosecution training
course and updated training every four (4) years thereafter, aligned with national best practices and
eligible for continuing legal education credit(s) as approved by the Rhode Island Bar Association.
The written order releasing the person charged or the written order issued at the time of disposition
shall contain the court’s directive and shall bear the legend: “Violation of this order is a criminal
offense under this section and will subject a violator to arrest”. A copy of the order shall be provided
LC002809 - Page 5 of 12

to the victim.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2025, said violation shall, at the initial appearance, be presented by
a member of a law enforcement agency and/or prosecuted by an attorney appointed by the
prosecuting authority all of whom shall be prosecuted by an attorney appointed by the prosecuting
authority who shall self-certify that they have successfully completed a specialized domestic
violence prosecution training course and updated training every four (4) years thereafter, aligned
with national best practices and eligible for continuing legal education credit(s) as approved by the
Rhode Island Bar Association. The written order releasing the person charged or the written order
issued at the time of disposition shall contain the court’s directive and shall bear the legend:
“Violation of this order is a criminal offense under this section and will subject a violator to arrest”.
A copy of the order shall be provided to the victim.
(4)(5) Whenever an order prohibiting contact is issued, modified, or terminated under
subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of this subsection, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order
on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order.
(b) Because of the serious nature of domestic violence, the court in domestic violence
actions:
(1) Shall not dismiss any charge or delay disposition because of concurrent dissolution of
marriage or other civil proceedings;
(2) Shall not require proof that either party is seeking a dissolution of marriage prior to
instigation of criminal proceedings;
(3) Shall identify by reasonable means on docket sheets those criminal actions arising from
acts of domestic violence; and
(4) Shall make clear to the defendant and victim that the prosecution of the domestic
violence action is determined by the prosecutor and not the victim.
(c) To facilitate compliance with the provisions of this section, the district court shall assure
that the misdemeanor and felony complaint forms indicate whether the crime charged involves
domestic violence and, if so, the relationship of the victim and defendant.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 12-10-12, the filing of any complaint for a crime
involving domestic violence shall be conditioned upon the defendant keeping the peace and being
of good behavior for a period of three (3) years. In the event a particular case involving domestic
violence is filed on a plea of not guilty, guilty or nolo contendere pursuant to § 12-10-12, the court
having jurisdiction shall retain the records of the case for a period of three (3) years from the date
of the filing. These records shall not be expunged, sealed, or otherwise destroyed for a period of
three (3) years from the date of filing. Furthermore, the destruction or sealing of records in the
LC002809 - Page 6 of 12

possession of the department of attorney general bureau of criminal identification, the
superintendent of the state police, or the police departments of any city or town after a filing related
to a crime involving domestic violence shall be governed by § 12-1-12.
SECTION 3. Section 15-15-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 15-15 entitled "Domestic
Abuse Prevention" is hereby amended to read as follows:
15-15-3. Protective orders — Penalty — Jurisdiction.
(a) A person, or a parent, custodian, or legal guardian on behalf of a minor child or the
director of the department of children, youth and families (“DCYF”) or its designee for a child in
the custody of DCYF, pursuant to §§ 40-11-7 and 40-11-7.1, suffering from domestic abuse or
sexual exploitation as defined in § 15-15-1, may file a complaint in the family court requesting any
order that will protect and support her or him from abuse or sexual exploitation, including, but not
limited to, the following:
(1) Ordering that the defendant be restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting,
molesting, sexually exploiting, or interfering with the plaintiff at home, on the street, or elsewhere,
whether the defendant is an adult or a minor;
(2) Ordering the defendant to vacate the household immediately, and further providing in
the order for the safety and welfare of all household animals and pets;
(3) Awarding the plaintiff custody of the minor children of the parties, if any;
(4) Ordering the defendant to surrender physical possession of all firearms in his or her
possession, care, custody, or control and shall further order a person restrained not to purchase or
receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, any firearms while the protective order is in effect. The
defendant shall surrender said firearms within twenty-four (24) hours of notice of the protective
order to the Rhode Island state police or local police department or to a federally licensed firearms
dealer.
(i) A person ordered to surrender possession of any firearm(s) pursuant to this section shall,
within seventy-two (72) hours after being served with the order, either:
(A) File with the court a receipt showing the firearm(s) was physically surrendered to the
Rhode Island state police or local police department, or to a federally licensed firearms dealer; or
(B) Attest to the court that, at the time of the order, the person had no firearms in his or her
immediate physical possession or control, or subject to their immediate physical possession or
control, and that the person, at the time of the attestation, has no firearms in their immediate
physical possession or control, or subject to their immediate physical possession or control.
(ii) If a person restrained under this section transfers a firearm(s) to a federally licensed
firearms dealer pursuant to this section, the person restrained under this section may instruct the
LC002809 - Page 7 of 12

federally licensed firearms dealer to sell the firearm(s) or to transfer ownership, in accordance with
state and federal law, to a qualified named individual who is not a member of the person’s dwelling
house, who is not related to the person by blood, marriage, or relationship as defined by § 15-15-
1(7), and who is not prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law. The owner of
any firearm(s) sold shall receive any financial value received from its sale, less the cost associated
with taking possession of, storing, and transferring of the firearm(s).
(iii) Every individual to whom ownership of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this
subsection shall be prohibited from transferring or returning any firearm(s) to the person restrained
under this section while the protective order remains in effect and shall be informed of this
prohibition, Any knowing violation of this subsection is a felony that shall be punishable by a fine
of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for a term of not less than one
year and not more than five (5) years, or both.
(iv) An individual to whom ownership of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this
subsection shall return a firearm(s) to the person formerly restrained under this section only if the
person formerly restrained under this section provides documentation issued by a court indicating
that the restraining order issued pursuant to this section that prohibited the person from purchasing,
carrying, transporting, or possessing firearms has expired and has not been extended;
(5) After notice to the respondent and a hearing, ordering either party to make payments
for the support of a minor child or children of the parties as required by law for a period not to
exceed ninety (90) days, unless the child support order is for a child or children receiving public
assistance pursuant to chapter 5.1 of title 40 [repealed]. In these cases, legal counsel for the division
of taxation, child support enforcement, shall be notified as a party in interest to appear for the
purpose of establishing a child support order under a new or existing docket number previously
assigned to the parties and not under the protective docket number. The child support order shall
remain in effect until the court modifies or suspends the order.
(b) After notice to the respondent and a hearing, which shall be held within fifteen (15)
days of surrendering said firearms, the court, in addition to any other restrictions, may, for any
protective order issued after or renewed on or after July 1, 2017, continue the order of surrender,
and shall further order a person restrained under this section not to purchase or receive, or attempt
to purchase or receive, any firearms while the protective order is in effect.
(c) The family court shall provide a notice on all forms requesting a protective order that a
person restrained under this section shall be ordered pursuant to § 11-47-5 to surrender possession
of any firearms while the protective order is in effect. The form shall further provide that any person
who has surrendered his or her firearms shall be afforded a hearing within fifteen (15) days of
LC002809 - Page 8 of 12

surrendering his or her firearms.
(d) Any firearm surrendered in accordance with this section to the Rhode Island state police
or local police department shall be returned to the person formerly restrained under this section
upon the person’s request when:
(1) The person formerly restrained under this section produces documentation issued by a
court indicating that the restraining order issued pursuant to this section that prohibited the person
from purchasing, carrying, transporting, or possessing firearms has expired and has not been
extended; and
(2) The law enforcement agency in possession of the firearms determined that the person
formerly restrained under this section is not otherwise prohibited from possessing a firearm under
state or federal law.
(3) The person required to surrender their firearms pursuant to this section shall not be
responsible for any costs of storage of any firearms surrendered pursuant to this section.
(e) The Rhode Island state police are authorized to develop rules and procedures pertaining
to the storage and return of firearms surrendered to the Rhode Island state police or local police
departments pursuant to this section. The Rhode Island state police may consult with the Rhode
Island Police Chiefs’ Association in developing rules and procedures.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, expand, or in any way modify orders
issued under § 12-29-7 or § 15-5-19.
(g) Nothing in this section shall limit a defendant’s right under existing law to petition the
court at a later date for modification of the order.
(h) The court shall immediately notify the person suffering from domestic abuse whose
complaint gave rise to the protective order, and the law enforcement agency where the person
restrained under this section resides, of the hearing.
(i) The person suffering from domestic abuse, local law enforcement, and the person
restrained under this section shall all have an opportunity to be present and to testify when the court
considers the petition.
(j) At the hearing, the person restrained under this section shall have the burden of showing,
by clear and convincing evidence, that, if his or her firearm rights were restored, he or she would
not pose a danger to the person suffering from domestic abuse or to any other person.
(1) In determining whether to restore a person’s firearm rights, the court shall examine all
relevant evidence, including, but not limited to: the complaint seeking a protective order; the
criminal record of the person restrained under this section; the mental health history of the person
restrained under this section; any evidence that the person restrained under this section has, since
LC002809 - Page 9 of 12

being served with the order, engaged in violent or threatening behavior against the person suffering
from domestic abuse or any other person.
(2) If the court determines, after a review of all relevant evidence and after all parties have
had an opportunity to be heard, that the person restrained under this section would not pose a danger
to the person suffering from domestic abuse or to any other person if their firearm rights were
restored, then the court may grant the petition and modify the protective order and lift the firearm
prohibition.
(3) If the court lifts a person’s firearms prohibition pursuant to this subsection, the court
shall issue the person written notice that the person is no longer prohibited under this section from
purchasing or possessing firearms while the protective order is in effect.
(k) The prohibition against possessing a firearm(s) due solely to the existence of a domestic
violence restraining order issued under this section shall not apply with respect to sworn peace
officers as defined in § 12-7-21 and active members of military service, including members of the
reserve components thereof, who are required by law or departmental policy to carry departmental
firearms while on duty or any person who is required by their employment to carry a firearm in the
performance of their duties. Any individual exempted pursuant to this exception may possess a
firearm only during the course of their employment. Any firearm required for employment must be
stored at the place of employment when not being possessed for employment use; all other
firearm(s) must be surrendered in accordance with this section.
(l) Upon motion by the plaintiff, the plaintiff’s address shall be released only at the
discretion of the family court judge.
(m)(1) Any violation of the protective orders in subsection (a) of this section shall subject
the defendant to being found in contempt of court.
(2) The contempt order shall not be exclusive and shall not preclude any other available
civil or criminal remedies. Any relief granted by the court shall be for a fixed period of time not to
exceed three (3) years, at the expiration of which time the court may extend any order, upon motion
of the plaintiff, for any additional time, that it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff from abuse.
The court may modify its order at any time upon motion of either party.
(n)(1) Any violation of a protective order under this chapter of which the defendant has
actual notice shall be a misdemeanor that shall be punished by a fine of no more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. Beginning July 1, 2025,
said violation shall be prosecuted by an attorney appointed by the prosecuting authority who shall
self-certify that they have successfully completed a specialized domestic violence prosecution
training course and updated training every four (4) years thereafter, aligned with national best
LC002809 - Page 10 of 12

practices and eligible for continuing legal education credit(s) as approved by the Rhode Island Bar
Association.
(2) The penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties as provided
by § 12-29-5.
(o) Beginning July 1, 2025, said violation shall, at the initial appearance, be presented by
a member of a law enforcement agency and/or prosecuted by an attorney appointed by the
prosecuting authority all of whom shall self-certify that they have successfully completed a
specialized domestic violence prosecution training course and updated training every four (4) years
thereafter, aligned with national best practices and eligible for continuing legal education credit(s)
as approved by the Rhode Island Bar Association.
(o)(p) Actual notice means that the defendant has received a copy of the order by service
or by being handed a copy of the order by a police officer pursuant to § 15-15-5(d).
(p)(q) (1) The district court shall have criminal jurisdiction over all adult violations of this
chapter.
(2) The family court shall have jurisdiction over all juvenile violations of this chapter.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC002809
========
LC002809 - Page 11 of 12